Utah statutes.
49-11-602.   Participating employer to maintain records -- Time limit --
Penalties for failure to comply.
(1)  A participating employer shall maintain records necessary to calculate
benefits under this title and other records necessary for proper
administration of this title as required by the office.
(2)  A participating employer shall maintain the records required under
Subsection (1) until the earliest of:
(a)  three years after the date of retirement of the employee from a system or
plan;
(b)  three years after the date of death of the employee; or
(c)  65 years from the date of employment with the participating employer.
(3)  A participating employer shall be liable to the office for:
(a)  any liabilities and expenses, including administrative expenses and the
cost of increased benefits to members, resulting from the participating
employer's failure to maintain records under this section; and
(b)  a penalty equal to 1% of the participating employer's last month's
contributions.
(4)  The executive director may waive all or any part of the interest,
penalties, expenses, and fees if the executive director finds there were
extenuating circumstances surrounding the participating employer's failure to
comply with this section.
(5)  The executive director may estimate the length of service, compensation,
or age of any member, if that information is not contained in the records.
